Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
673]

NATIVE
HAWAIIAN TRUSTS JUDICIAL RELIEF ACT

Section

673-1 Waiver of immunity

673-2 Right to sue

673-3 Exhaustion of administrative remedies

673-4 Scope of relief

673-5 Attorney's fees and costs

673-6 Award or judgment as bar

673-7 Limited remedy

673-8 Proof of liability

673-9 Inapplicability to share of office of
Hawaiian

affairs

673-10 Limitation on actions; native Hawaiians

Note

Hawaiian home lands trust claims. L 1992, c 316; L 1993, c 352.

Cross References

Lands conveyed for development of housing projects, see
§§10-13.6 and 171-18.5.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Native Hawaiian Trusts Judicial Relief Act: The First
Step in an Attempt to Provide Relief. 14 UH L. Rev. 889 (1992).

Courts and the Cultural Performance: Native Hawaiians'
Uncertain Federal and State Law Rights to Sue. 16 UH L. Rev. 1 (1994).

A Modest Proposal for Determining Class Member Damages:
Aggregation and Extrapolation in the Kalima v. State Breach of Homelands Trust
Class Action. 34 UH L. Rev. 1 (2012).

Case Notes

Where breach of trust claims were for damages resulting from
the State's breach of trust duties and did not require a determination of the
office of Hawaiian affairs' proportionate share of revenues under §673-9, this
chapter applied to the instant claims. 110 H. 338, 133 P.3d 767 (2006).

Where plaintiffs failed to comply with the sixty-day notice
requirement for filing suit under §673-3, this failure precluded the supreme
court from reviewing any claims brought under this chapter. 110 H. 338, 133
P.3d 767 (2006).

Defendant State and state officials did not waive their
sovereign immunity pursuant to chapter 673 where plaintiffs did not bring their
claims under chapter 673 in their first amended complaint and plaintiffs'
after-the-fact reliance on chapter 673 for a waiver of the State's sovereign
immunity was solely for the purpose of their attorneys' fee request. 130 H.
162, 307 P.3d 142 (2013).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next